Hawaii statutes.
§490:4A-202 Authorized and verified payment
orders. (a) A payment order received by the receiving bank is the
authorized order of the person identified as sender if that person authorized
the order or is otherwise bound by it under the law of agency.

(b) If a bank and its customer have agreed
that the authenticity of payment orders issued to the bank in the name of the
customer as sender will be verified pursuant to a security procedure, a payment
order received by the receiving bank is effective as the order of the customer,
whether or not authorized, if (i) the security procedure is a commercially
reasonable method of providing security against unauthorized payment orders,
and (ii) the bank proves that it accepted the payment order in good faith and in
compliance with the security procedure and any written agreement or instruction
of the customer restricting acceptance of payment orders issued in the name of
the customer. The bank is not required to follow an instruction that violates
a written agreement with the customer or notice of which is not received at a
time and in a manner affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it
before the payment order is accepted.

(c) Commercial reasonableness of a security
procedure is a question of law to be determined by considering the wishes of
the customer expressed to the bank, the circumstances of the customer known to
the bank, including the size, type, and frequency of payment orders normally
issued by the customer to the bank, alternative security procedures offered to
the customer, and security procedures in general use by customers and receiving
banks similarly situated. A security procedure is deemed to be commercially
reasonable if (i) the security procedure was chosen by the customer after the
bank offered, and the customer refused, a security procedure that was
commercially reasonable for that customer, and (ii) the customer expressly
agreed in writing to be bound by any payment order, whether or not authorized,
issued in its name and accepted by the bank in compliance with the security
procedure chosen by the customer.

(d) The term "sender" in this article
includes the customer in whose name a payment order is issued if the order is
the authorized order of the customer under subsection (a), or it is effective
as the order of the customer under subsection (b).

(e) This section applies to amendments and
cancellations of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment
orders.

(f) Except as provided in this section and in
section 490:4A-203(a)(1), rights and obligations arising under this section or
section 490:4A-203 may not be varied by agreement. [L 1991, c 41, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next